Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-828
Proceeding, civil or criminal; application to court for copy of material; order; contempt of court, when.

In any proceeding, civil or criminal under sections 28-807 to 28-829, the party charged with possession of any obscene material shall be required, upon application by petitioner and order of the court, to provide one copy of such material to petitioner to be used in the preparation and trial of such proceedings. Failure to comply with this section shall be punishable as contempt of court.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 184.